District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.39

Persons not to act for unauthorized companies.

Except as provided in § 31-2502.40, no person shall act as agent in the District for any company which is not authorized to do business in the District, nor shall any person directly or indirectly negotiate for or solicit applications for policies of, or for membership in, any company which is not authorized to do business in the District. The term “company” as used in this section shall include any association, society, company, corporation, joint-stock company, individual, partnership, trustee, or receiver engaged in the business of assuming risks of insurance, surety, or indemnity, and any Lloyd’s organization, assessment, or cooperative fire company, or any reciprocal or interinsurance exchange and any company, association, or society, whether organized for profit or not, conducting a business, including any of the principles or features of insurance, surety, or indemnity. Any person who violates any provision of this section upon conviction shall be fined not less than $100 nor more than $1,000 for each offense, or be imprisoned for not more than 12 months, or both, and any such person shall be personally liable to any resident of the District having claim against any such unauthorized company under any policy which said person has solicited or negotiated, or has aided in soliciting or negotiating; provided, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to any person who negotiates with an unauthorized company for policies covering his own property or interests, nor shall the provisions of this section apply to the officers, agents, or representatives of any company which is in process of organization under the laws of the District, and which is authorized temporarily to solicit or secure memberships or applications for policies for the purpose of completing such organization. Prosecutions for violations of this section shall be upon information filed in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel or any of his assistants.

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1080, ch. 792, ch. II, § 39
Feb. 22, 1958, 72 Stat. 26, Pub. L. 85-334, § 10
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)

History

This section is referenced in § 31-231 and § 31-1131.08.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 35-1543.
1973 Ed., § 35-1343.

Prior Codifications